Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1561.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-420.06, to read: START_STATUTE36-420.06. Assisted living facilities; eviction; discharge; notice; statement of resident's rights in any notice provided to a resident of an assisted living facility on discharge or eviction, the assisted living facility shall provide a statement of the resident's rights. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Vulnerable adult system study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The vulnerable adult system study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the house of representatives who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who are members of different political parties.  The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 2. Two members of the senate who are appointed by the president of the senate and who are members of different political parties. The president of the senate shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 3. The director of the department of health services or the director's designee. 4. The director of the department of economic security or the director's designee. 5. The director of the Arizona health care cost containment system or the director's designee. 6. One member who represents the governor's office and who is appointed by the governor. 7. One member who represents the attorney general's office and who is appointed by the attorney general. 8. One member who currently serves as the department of economic security's long-term care ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee. 9. One member who currently serves as a public fiduciary and who is appointed by the governor. 10. Two members who are employed by a local law enforcement agency or who are employed by a statewide organization that represents law enforcement and who are appointed by the governor. 11. The executive director of the Navajo area agency on aging or the executive director's designee. 12. The executive director of the inter tribal council of Arizona or the executive director's designee. 13. Two members who represent assisted living facilities and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 14. Two members who represent nursing care institutions and who are appointed by the governor. 15. One member who represents a statewide organization that advocates for elderly vulnerable adults and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 16. One member who represents a statewide organization that advocates on behalf of persons affected by Alzheimer's disease and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 17. One member who represents a statewide association that advocates on behalf of persons who provide services to persons with developmental disabilities and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 18. One health care professional who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who both: (a) Is licensed pursuant to title 32, Arizona Revised Statutes. (b) Provides health care services to elderly vulnerable adults. 19. One member who is on the governor's advisory council on aging and who is appointed by the governor. 20. One member who represents a statewide association representing firefighters in this state and who is appointed by the president of the senate. B. The vulnerable adult system study committee shall: 1. Develop and implement a coordinated vulnerable adult delivery system that ensures the health and safety of vulnerable adults. 2. Recommend best practices relating to responding to and investigating complaints. 3. Research best practices related to adult protective services at the state, municipality and community levels. 4. Research and make recommendations on how the vulnerable adult system can ensure that vulnerable adults receive services they require after the vulnerable adult system completes its investigatory duties, including assigning a specific agency with the responsibility to provide or coordinate case management. 5. Research and identify common statewide outcomes. 6. Identify best practices for data collection and data sharing by various entities involved in providing vulnerable adult services. 7. Review and recommend changes to the statutes and rules that govern vulnerable adult services. C. The cochairpersons may designate work groups to research, study and make recommendations to the study committee.  At least two work groups shall be established to separately address the needs of persons with developmental disabilities and persons who are elderly or who have a physical disability, including the training requirements for persons who are caring for these populations. D. Once a strategic direction is established, the department of economic security, in conjunction with the work groups, shall develop an action plan for implementation. E. Public members of the study committee are eligible to receive reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. F. On or before October 1, 2026 and each October 1 thereafter, the study committee shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. G. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2028. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.